Tennessee, session 114, HB0147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-69-109(c), is amended by deleting
the following:
A copy of such report and a copy of the annual audit referenced in subsection (a)
shall be filed annually with the governing body of the municipality granting
permission to the authority to organize.
and substituting instead:
A copy of such report and a copy of the annual audit referenced in subsection (a)
must be filed annually with the governing body of the municipality granting
permission to the authority to organize and to each member of the general
assembly who represents the municipality. The report may be filed electronically.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0147
000839
- 1 -